Utah statutes.
32B-10-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter, "special use permit" means a special use permit issued under this chapter, including:

(1)  a religious wine use permit;

(2)  an industrial or manufacturing use permit;

(3)  a scientific or educational use permit; and

(4)  a public service permit.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

